test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-mielkk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - mieʹlǩǩ â-stem: # Noun 'milk/maito' - full paradigm
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: mieʹlǩǩ
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: mieʹlǩ
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: mieʹlǩ
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: meâlkka
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: mieʹlǩest
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Com+Indef: mieʹlǩin
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Ess+Indef: mieʹlǩǩen
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Par+Indef: mieʹlǩǩed
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [mieʹlǩtaa, mieʹlǩtää]
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: mieʹlǩ
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: mieʹlǩi
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: mieʹlǩid
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: mieʹlǩid
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: mieʹlǩin
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Com+Indef: mieʹlǩivuiʹm
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [mieʹlǩitaa, mieʹlǩitää]
